Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.210

Realignment of parties—Domestic violence and antiharassment protection order proceedings.

In proceedings where the petitioner is seeking a domestic violence protection order or an antiharassment protection order, the court may realign the designation of the parties as "petitioner" and "respondent" where the court finds that the original petitioner is the abuser or harasser and the original respondent is the victim of domestic violence or unlawful harassment. The court may issue a temporary protection order in accordance with this chapter until the victim is able to prepare a petition for a protection order in accordance with this chapter.

[ 2021 c 215 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.